Hawaii statutes.
§302D-26 Civil service status; employee
rights. (a) Civil service employees of department schools shall retain
their civil service status upon the conversion of their school to a conversion
charter school. Positions in a conversion charter school that would be civil
service in a department school shall be civil service positions and subject to
chapter 76. An employee with civil service status at a conversion charter
school who transfers, is promoted, or takes a voluntary demotion to another
civil service position shall be entitled to all of the rights, privileges, and
benefits of continuous, uninterrupted civil service. Civil service employees
of a conversion charter school shall have civil service status in the
department's civil service system and shall be entitled to all rights,
privileges, and benefits as other civil service employees employed by the
department. Exempt employees as provided in section 76-16(b)(11)(B) of a
conversion charter school shall have support services personnel status in the
department's support services personnel system and shall be entitled to all
rights, privileges, and benefits as other exempt employees employed by the
department in their support services personnel system.

(b) The State shall afford administrative, support,
and instructional employees in charter schools full participation in the
State's systems for retirement, workers' compensation, unemployment insurance,
temporary disability insurance, and health benefits in accordance with the
qualification requirements for each.

(c) The department, to the extent possible,
shall provide its position listings to authorizers and any interested governing
board of any charter school.

(d) The department, in conjunction with
authorizers, shall facilitate the movement of instructional personnel between
the department and charter schools; provided that:

(1) Comparable and verifiable professional
development and employee evaluation standards and practices, as determined and
certified by the authorizers, are in place in charter schools for instructional
staff;

(2) Licensed charter school teachers, as determined
by the Hawaii teacher standards board, who are not yet tenured in the
department and are entering or returning to the department after employment at
a charter school, shall be subject to a probationary period in the department
pursuant to policies and practices as determined by the department, the board,
and collective bargaining agreements; and

(3) Tenured department licensed teachers, as
determined by the department, who transfer to charter schools shall be subject
to the appropriate collective bargaining agreement.

(e) The department shall establish a process
that permits employees of department public schools that become conversion
charter schools pursuant to section 302D-13 to transfer to a department public
school governed by chapter 302A. [L 2012, c 130, pt of §2; am L 2014, c 99, §17;
am L 2015, c 112, §2 and c 114, §9]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next